Illinois, session 104th, HB2434.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; references to Act. 5    (a) Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Compassionate Support for Bereaved Mothers Act. 7    (b) References to Act. This Act may be referred to as the 8Heal Your Heart Act. 9    Section 5. Purpose. It is the purpose of this Act to 10provide comprehensive support for mothers who have lost their 11children due to murder by ensuring they receive the necessary 12mental health care, leave from work, financial assistance, and 13safe housing options during their period of mourning. 14    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 15    "Bereaved mother" means a mother whose child was, more 16likely than not, knowingly killed by an unknown or other 17person. 18    "Child" includes a dependent adult as defined under 19Illinois law. 20    "Disability leave" means paid leave granted to an employee 21for a specified period due to mental health issues stemming 22from the traumatic loss of a child.   HB2434- 2 -LRB104 10805 SPS 20886 b1    "Employee" means eligible employee, as defined by Section 2101(2) of the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 3U.S.C. 2601 et seq.). 4    "Housing Choice Voucher" means a voucher issued by a 5housing authority under Section 8 of the United States Housing 6Act of 1937 as part of the federal assistance program 7administered by the Department of Housing and Urban 8Development to help low-income families, the elderly, and the 9disabled afford safe and sanitary housing in the private 10market. 11    "Mental health support" means counseling and psychiatric 12services provided to bereaved mothers. 13    Section 15. Eligibility. This Act applies to any bereaved 14mother whose child was, more likely than not, knowingly killed 15within this State and whose child was a resident of this State 16at the time of death. 17    Section 20. Mental health support. 18    (a) A bereaved mother shall be entitled to free mental 19health counseling and psychiatric services for a period of up 20to one year following the death of the bereaved mother's 21child. The Department of Human Services shall coordinate with 22licensed mental health professionals and facilities to provide 23these services. Services may include individual therapy, group 24therapy, medication management, and any other necessary mental   HB2434- 3 -LRB104 10805 SPS 20886 b1health treatment. 2    (b) The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules to 3administer and enforce this Section. 4    Section 25. Paid leave and financial assistance. 5    (a) A bereaved mother who is an employee shall be entitled 6to a minimum of 12 weeks of paid disability leave from any 7employer. During this leave, bereaved mothers shall receive 8compensation equivalent to their full salary. 9    (b) Upon a determination of medical necessity and approval 10by the Department of Labor in coordination with the Department 11of Human Services and mental health care providers, disability 12benefits under subsection (a) may be extended for a maximum of 13one year. 14    (c) A bereaved mother shall be entitled to an additional 1510 days of paid leave immediately following the death of the 16bereaved mother's child. 17        (1) This leave is in addition to the disability leave 18    under subsections (a) and (b). 19        (2) Paid leave taken under this subsection (c) may be 20    taken consecutively or intermittently within the first 21    year of the death of the bereaved mother's child. 22    (d) An employer may require reasonable documentation. 23Documentation may include a death certificate, a published 24obituary, or written verification of death, burial, or 25memorial services from a mortuary, funeral home, burial   HB2434- 4 -LRB104 10805 SPS 20886 b1society, crematorium, religious institution, or government 2agency. An employer may require that the documentation include 3the cause of death. 4    (e) Leave taken under this Act is mutually exclusive with 5leave taken under the Child Extended Bereavement Leave Act. 6The bereaved mother may decide which Act she takes leave 7under.8    (f) An employer shall not terminate, demote, or otherwise 9penalize a bereaved mother taking disability leave under this 10Act. 11    (g) An employer shall not retaliate against a bereaved 12mother for taking leave under this Act. 13    (h) The Department of Labor shall adopt rules to 14administer and enforce this Section. 15    Section 30. Relocation support. 16    (a) As permitted by federal law, a bereaved mother living 17in subsidized housing, scattered site housing, or public 18housing units shall be eligible for relocation to another unit 19if the bereaved mother feels threatened or unsafe. 20    (b) As permitted by federal law, eligible bereaved mothers 21may receive a Housing Choice Voucher to relocate to a safer 22location. 23    (c) Temporary housing and relocation costs shall be paid 24by the Bereaved Mothers Fund, a special fund that is created in 25the State treasury. The fund shall be used to cover the costs   HB2434- 5 -LRB104 10805 SPS 20886 b1associated with this Act and shall be funded through federal 2grants, private donations, and other sources.3    (d) The Department of Human Services, after consulting 4with the Department of Housing and Urban Development, shall 5adopt rules to administer and enforce this Section. 6    Section 35. Annual report. Before December 31, 2026, and 7each year thereafter, the Department of Human Services and the 8Department of Labor shall jointly submit an annual report to 9the Governor and the General Assembly detailing the 10implementation, usage, and effectiveness of this Act. 11    Section 90. Repealer. This Act is repealed 5 years after 12becoming law.  13    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 14Section 5.1030 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)16    Sec. 5.1030. The Bereaved Mothers Fund. 17    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 181, 2026.